New York, session 2025-2026, A2330.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Sections 1-u and 1-v of the legislative law, section 1-v 2 as relettered by chapter 1 of the laws of 2005, are renumbered sections 3 1-v and 1-w and a new section 1-u is added to read as follows: 4 § 1-u. Electronic filing. All statements and reports required by this 5 article shall be submitted electronically using the commission's online 6 filing system. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 8 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01969-01-5